Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1123
Violations; penalty.

Any person, employer, labor organization, or employment agency who or which willfully resists, prevents, impedes, or interferes with the commission or any of its members or representatives in the performance of duty under the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act or willfully violates an order of the commission shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Procedure for the review of the order shall not be deemed to be such willful conduct.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 23, p. 797;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 302;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 17.